Utah statutes.
58-49-5.   Certification of persons currently qualified.
The requirements of Subsections 58-49-4(2), (3), and (4) are waived and a
certificate shall be issued by the division upon application and payment of
the appropriate fees by any person who, prior to December 31, 1986, has
provided to the division proof that on May 1, 1985, he was and is currently
registered by the Commission on Dietetic Registration.
